Massachusetts, session 194th, S2830.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 186 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:-
Section 32. Cimex lectularius.
(a) For purposes of this section the following words shall have the following definitions,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Control” means the process required by a professional pesticide applicator in an attempt
to eliminate or manage an infestation of bed bugs by poisoning, spraying, fumigating, trapping or
by any other recognized and lawful pest-elimination method, including repeated applications of
any treatment, particularly to areas where bed bugs are likely to congregate, provided that the
department of public health may recommend and issue standards on treatment methods as they
see fit based on the availability of updated information and science. Control of bed bugs shall be
deemed completed if there has been no evidence of bed bug activity for thirty (30) days after the
last application of any treatment.
of 3

“Infestation” means the presence of bed bugs, or signs of their presence, in a quantity
large enough that the tenant of a dwelling unit has knowledge, or should have knowledge, of the
presence of bed bugs in the dwelling unit.
“Certified Applicator” shall have the meaning provided in section 2 of chapter 132B.
(b) Any tenant with actual knowledge of the presence of bed bugs in said tenant’s
dwelling unit shall: (1) immediately provide notice to the owner in writing after becoming aware
of the presence of bed bugs; (2) allow the owner, as well as its agents, inspectors, certified
applicators, and contractors, to enter the dwelling unit to perform inspections repairs,
exterminations, and applications, upon not less than 24 hour notice; (3) comply with all protocols
and instructions afforded to tenant by the certified applicator, including without limitation,
encasing and sealing personal property in plastic bags, laundering personal property, removing
personal property which may be to be infested with bed bugs; and (4) remove personal property
identified for removal by the certified applicator. No tenant shall interfere with the certified
applicator’s performance of any extermination or inspection. Any tenant that fails to provide
access to the dwelling unit, interferes with any inspection or extermination, or fails to comply
with the protocols and/or instructions of the certified applicator, shall be responsible for any
actual and consequential damages incurred by the owner as a result of such denials.
(c) Within 5 business days of receiving a notice under subsection b, the landlord shall
commence an extermination protocol and notify the tenants and owners of any surrounding units;
provided, that if a certified inspector fails to observe an infestation of bed bugs, the owner shall
have no further obligation under this section. The owner shall perform all treatments and
of 3

exterminator services as may be required by the certified applicator until the bed bug infestation
is resolved.
An owner shall be deemed to have constructive knowledge of an infestation of bed bugs
in the event the owner is aware of an infestation of bed bugs in any surrounding unit. If an owner
has actual or constructive knowledge of the presence of bed bugs in a vacant unit or otherwise
prior to the signing of a lease for a new tenant, the owner must take action under this subsection
or the lease shall be void.
SECTION 2. Section 127Q. Cimex Lectularius Awareness
The department of public health shall prepare informational materials that describes bed
bugs, how to avoid infestations and legal rights and obligations imposed on tenants and
landlords. Said informational materials may contain additional information that the department
deems necessary and shall be updated by the department as new information concerning bed
bugs becomes available.
SECTION 3. The executive office of housing and livable communities may promulgate
regulations pursuant to section 32 of chapter 186, as inserted by section 1 of this act.
of 3